Maryland, session 2025, HB0714.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
22–102.
This title applies only in Harford County.
22–1005.2.
(b) There is a performing arts nonprofit organization beer, wine, and liquor
license.
(k) (1) The license holder shall:
– 1 –

Ch. 788 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) keep complete and accurate records of all alcoholic beverages
sold, served, and purchased under this section;
(ii) on written request of [the Comptroller,] the Board[,] or the
Executive Director, report on the form that [the Comptroller,] the Board[,] or the Executive
Director requires information relating to the alcoholic beverages that are the subject of the
records required to be kept; and
(iii) on request of [the Comptroller,] the Board[,] or the Executive
Director, make the report under oath.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, each
license holder shall keep records at the location designated in the license.
(ii) If the license holder is allowed to have more than one location,
the license holder may keep the records at the principal location.
(iii) The records shall:
1. meet form and content requirements of [the Comptroller,]
the Board[,] or the Executive Director;
2. be preserved for at least 2 years in a manner that ensures
permanency; and
3. be made available for audit or inspection during regular
business hours by [the Comptroller,] the Board, [or] the Executive Director, or a designee
of [the Comptroller,] the Board[,] or the Executive Director.
(3) (i) [The Comptroller may without a hearing immediately suspend
for a maximum of 30 days the license of a license holder who fails to comply with this
subsection.
(ii)] If a report required by this section or an investigation by the
Board, a Board officer, [the Comptroller,] the Executive Director, or any other person
indicates that the license holder is violating this section, the Board [shall] MAY summon
the license holder and conduct a hearing.
[(iii)] (II) If the charges at the hearing are sustained, the Board:
1. [shall] MAY impose a fine of not less than $250 and not
more than $2,000; and
2. may suspend or revoke the license holder’s license
immediately.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 788
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –